Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201783-1202
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) All persons with developmental disabilities shall receive services and assistance which present opportunities to increase their independence, productivity, and integration into the community;

(2) All persons with developmental disabilities shall have access to a full array of services appropriate for them as individuals;

(3) All persons with developmental disabilities shall have a right to live, work, and recreate with people who are not disabled;

(4) All persons with developmental disabilities shall be served in their communities and should only be served by specialized programs when their needs cannot be met through general services available to all persons, including those without disabilities;

(5) All persons with developmental disabilities shall have the right to receive age-appropriate services consistent with their individual needs, potentials, and abilities;

(6) All persons with developmental disabilities shall be afforded the same rights, dignity, and respect as members of society who are not disabled; and

(7) Persons who deliver services to persons with developmental disabilities shall be assured a uniform system of compensation and training and a full range of work-site enhancements which attract and retain qualified employees.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB333, § 4.
May 24, 2017